California statutes. Education Code
 nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, shall not charge tuition, and shall not discriminate against any pupil on the basis of ethnicity, national origin, gender, gender identity, gender expression, or disability. Except as provided in paragraph (2), admission to a charter school shall not be determined according to the place of residence of the pupil, or of the pupil’s parent or guardian, within this state.

(2) (A) A charter school shall admit all pupils who wish to attend the charter school.

(B) If the number of pupils who wish to attend the charter school exceeds the charter school’s capacity, attendance, except for existing pupils of the charter school, shall be determined by a public random drawing. Preference shall be extended to pupils currently attending the charter school and pupils who reside
 in the county except as provided for in Section 47614.5. Preferences, including, but not limited to, siblings of pupils admitted or attending the charter school and children of the charter school’s teachers, staff, and founders identified in the initial charter, may also be permitted by the chartering authority on an individual charter school basis. Priority order for any preference shall be determined in the charter petition in accordance with all of the following:

(i) Each type of preference shall be approved by the chartering authority at a public hearing.

(ii) Preferences shall be consistent with federal law, the California Constitution, and Section 200.

(iii) Preferences shall not result in limiting enrollment access for pupils with disabilities, academically
 low achieving pupils, English learners, neglected or delinquent pupils, homeless pupils, or pupils who are economically disadvantaged, as determined by eligibility for any free or reduced-price meal program, foster youth, or pupils based on nationality, race, ethnicity, or sexual orientation.

(iv) In accordance with Section 49011, preferences shall not require mandatory parental volunteer hours as a criterion for admission or continued enrollment.

(C) In the event of a drawing, the county board of education shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the growth of the charter school and in no event shall take any action to impede the charter school from expanding enrollment to meet pupil demand.

(3) If a pupil is expelled or leaves the charter school without graduating or
 completing the school year for any reason, the charter school shall notify the superintendent of the school district of the pupil’s last known address within 30 days and shall, upon request, provide that school district with a copy of the cumulative record of the pupil, including report cards or a transcript of grades, and health information. If the pupil is subsequently expelled or leaves the school district without graduating or completing the school year for any reason, the school district shall provide this information to the charter school within 30 days if the charter school demonstrates that the pupil had been enrolled in the charter school. This paragraph applies only to pupils subject to compulsory full-time education pursuant to Section 48200.

(4) (A) A charter school shall not discourage a pupil from enrolling or seeking to enroll in the charter school for any reason, including, but not limited to, academic
 performance of the pupil or because the pupil exhibits any of the characteristics described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(B) A charter school shall not request a pupil’s records or require a parent, guardian, or pupil to submit the pupil’s records to the charter school before enrollment.

(C) A charter school shall not encourage a pupil currently attending the charter school to disenroll from the charter school or transfer to another school for any reason, including, but not limited to, academic performance of the pupil or because the pupil exhibits any of the characteristics described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2). This subparagraph shall not apply to actions taken by a charter school pursuant to the procedures described in subparagraph
 (I)
 of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(D) The department shall develop a notice of the requirements of this paragraph. This notice shall be posted on a charter school’s internet website. A charter school shall provide a parent or guardian, or a pupil if the pupil is 18 years of age or older, a copy of this notice at all of the following times:

(i) When a parent, guardian, or pupil inquires about enrollment.

(ii) Before conducting an enrollment lottery.

(iii) Before disenrollment of a pupil.

(E) (i) A person who suspects that a charter school has violated this paragraph may file a complaint with the chartering authority.

(ii) The department shall develop a template to be used for filing complaints pursuant to clause (i).

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, a charter school in operation as of July 1, 2019, that operates in partnership with the California National Guard may dismiss a pupil from the charter school for failing to maintain the minimum standards of conduct required by the Military Department.

(6) A charter school shall, at a governing body meeting, obtain the approval of the governing body of the charter school for any contract that would cause the charter school to compensate an individual contractor more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in a fiscal year.

(f) The county board of education shall not require an employee of the county or a school district to be employed in a charter school.

(g) The county board of education shall not require a pupil enrolled in a county program to attend a charter school.

(h) The county board of education shall require that the petitioner or petitioners provide information regarding the proposed operation and potential effects of the charter school, including, but not limited to, the facilities to be used by the charter school, the manner in which administrative services of the charter school are to be provided, and potential civil liability effects, if any, upon the charter school, any school district where the charter school may operate, and upon the county board of education. The petitioner or petitioners shall also be required to provide financial statements that include a proposed
 first-year operational budget, including startup costs, and cashflow and financial projections for the first three years of operation. If the charter school is to be operated by, or as, a nonprofit public benefit corporation, the petitioner shall provide the names and relevant qualifications of all persons whom the petitioner nominates to serve on the governing body of the charter school.

(i) In reviewing petitions for the establishment of charter schools within the county, the county board of education shall give preference to petitions that demonstrate the capability to provide comprehensive learning experiences to pupils identified by the petitioner or petitioners as academically low achieving pursuant to the standards established by the department under Section 54032, as that section read before July 19, 2006.

(j) Upon the approval of the petition by the county board of
 education, the petitioner or petitioners shall provide written notice of that approval, including a copy of the petition, to the school districts within the county, the Superintendent, and the state board.

(k) If a county board of education denies a petition, the petitioner shall not elect to submit the petition for the establishment of the charter school to the state board.

(l) (1) Teachers in charter schools shall be required to hold the Commission on Teacher Credentialing certificate, permit, or other document required for the teacher’s certificated assignment. These documents shall be maintained on file at the charter school and shall be subject to periodic inspection by the chartering authority. A governing body of a direct-funded charter school may use local assignment options authorized in statute and regulations for the purpose of legally
 assigning certificated teachers, in accordance with all of the requirements of the applicable statutes or regulations in the same manner as a governing board of a school district. A charter school shall have authority to request an emergency permit or a waiver from the Commission on Teacher Credentialing for individuals in the same manner as a school district.

(2) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall include in the bulletins it issues pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 44237 to provide notification to local educational agencies of any adverse actions taken against the holders of any commission documents, notice of any adverse actions taken against teachers employed by charter schools. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall make this bulletin available to all chartering authorities and charter schools in the same manner in which it is made available to local educational agencies.

(m) A charter school shall provide for an annual and independent financial and compliance audit in accordance with Section 41020.

(n) A charter school may encourage parental involvement but shall notify the parents and guardians of applicant pupils and currently enrolled pupils that parental involvement
 is not a requirement for acceptance to, or continued enrollment at, the charter school.

(o) The requirements of this section shall not be waived by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 93.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

47605.7.

(a) A petition for the establishment of a charter school shall not be denied based on the actual or potential costs of serving individuals with exceptional needs, as that term is defined pursuant to Section 56026.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section shall not be construed to prevent a school district from meeting its obligation to ensure that the proposed charter school will meet the needs of individuals with exceptional needs in accordance with state and federal law, nor shall it be construed to limit or alter the reasons for denying a petition for the establishment of a charter school pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 47605.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 70.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

47605.9.

(a) A petition to establish a charter school under this part may be submitted only to the governing board of the school district or county office of education within the boundaries of which the charter school proposes to locate.

(b) A charter school operating under a charter approved by the state board pursuant to Section 47605, as that section read on January 1, 2019, may continue to operate under the authority of that chartering authority only until the date on which the charter is up for renewal, at which point the charter school shall submit a petition for renewal to the governing board of the school district within the boundaries of which the charter school is located. If the governing board of the school district denies the renewal petition, the charter
 school may submit the petition for renewal directly to the state board, which shall review the petition in accordance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 47605. If the state board grants renewal pursuant to Section 47607, the state board shall designate, in consultation with the petitioner, either the governing board of the school district or the county board of education in which the charter school is located as the chartering authority. Subsequent renewals shall be subject to the same requirements as other charter schools authorized by the designated chartering authority, including review by the state board in accordance with Section 47607 and paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Section 47605.

(c) A charter school operating under a charter approved by the state board pursuant to Section 47605.8, as that section read on January 1, 2019, may continue to operate under the authority of that chartering authority
 only until the date on which the charter is up for renewal. The charter school shall submit a petition for renewal to the state board. If the state board grants renewal pursuant to Section 47607, the state board shall designate, in consultation with the petitioner, the governing board of the school district or the county board of education in which the charter school is located as the chartering authority. A charter school assigned to a county board of education under this subdivision shall qualify as a charter school pursuant to Section 47605.6, but, notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of data collection and reporting, the charter school shall continue to disaggregate and report pupil-level data at the schoolsite level
 consistent with how it reported data to the department when it was authorized under Section 47605.8, as that section read on January 1, 2019. Subsequent renewals shall be subject to the same requirements as other charter schools authorized by the same chartering authorities, including review by the state board in accordance with Section 47607 and paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Section 47605.

(d) A charter school designated to a new chartering authority pursuant to this section shall be regarded by the department as a continuing charter school for all purposes.

(e) The requirements of this section shall not be waived by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 94.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

47606.

(a) A school district may convert all of its schools to charter schools under this part only if it meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Fifty percent of the teachers within the school district sign the charter petition.

(2) The charter petition contains all of the requirements set forth in subdivisions (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of Section 47605 and a provision that specifies alternative public school attendance arrangements for pupils residing within the school district who choose not to attend charter schools.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 47605, the districtwide charter
 petition shall be approved only by joint action of the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the State Board of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 71.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

47606.2.

A petition to establish a charter school shall contain, in addition to the reasonably comprehensive description of the procedures by which pupils can be suspended or expelled from the charter school for disciplinary reasons or otherwise involuntarily removed from the charter school for any reason and the explanation of how the charter school will comply with federal and state constitutional procedural and substantive due process requirements that are required by Section 47605, a statement that the suspension procedures will include both of the following requirements:

(a) Upon the request of a parent, a legal guardian or other person holding the right to make education decisions for the pupil, or the affected pupil, a teacher shall provide to a pupil in any of grades
 1 to 12, inclusive, who has been suspended from school for two or more schooldays, the homework that the pupil would otherwise have been assigned.

(b) If a homework assignment that is requested pursuant to subdivision (a) and turned into the teacher by the pupil either upon the pupil’s return to school from suspension or within the timeframe originally prescribed by the teacher, whichever is later, is not graded before the end of the academic term, that assignment shall not be included in the calculation of the pupil’s overall grade in the class.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 779, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

47606.3.

(a) For purposes of clause (ii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 and clause (ii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, the procedures shall require the following:

(1) For all schools, the development of a school safety plan, which shall include the safety topics listed in subparagraphs (A) to (N), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 32282.

 (2) For schools serving pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, the development of a school safety plan shall also include the safety topic listed in subparagraph (O) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 32282.

(3) The review and update of the school safety plan by March 1 of every year by the charter school.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 124, Sec. 6.   (SB 98)   Effective September 20, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.\n   See later operative version added by Sec. 7 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 124.)
-------------------------------------------

47606.3.

(a) For purposes of clause (ii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 and clause (ii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, the procedures shall require the following:

(1) For all schools, the development of a school safety plan, which shall include the safety topics listed in subparagraphs (A) to (M), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 32282.

(2) For schools serving pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, the development of a school safety plan shall also include the safety topic listed in subparagraph (N) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 32282.

(3) The review and update of the school safety plan by March 1 of every year by the charter school.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2031.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 124, Sec. 7.   (SB 98)   Effective September 20, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

47606.5.

(a) On or before July 1, 2015, and each year thereafter, the governing body of a charter school shall hold a public hearing to adopt a local control and accountability plan using a template adopted by the state board. The governing body of a charter school shall update the goals and annual actions to achieve those goals identified in the charter petition pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable, using the template for the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 52064 and shall include all of the following:

(1) A review of the
 progress toward the goals included in the charter, an assessment of the effectiveness of the specific actions described in the charter toward achieving the goals, and a description of changes to the specific actions the charter school will make as a result of the review and assessment.

(2) A listing and description of the expenditures for the fiscal year implementing the specific actions included in the charter as a result of the reviews and assessment required by paragraph (1).

(b) For purposes of the review required by subdivision (a), a governing body of a charter school may consider qualitative information, including, but not limited to, findings that result from school quality reviews conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52052 or any other reviews.

(c) To the extent practicable, data reported
 pursuant to this section shall be reported in a manner consistent with how information is reported on the California School Dashboard maintained by the department pursuant to Section 52064.5.

(d) The charter school shall consult with teachers, principals, administrators, other school personnel, parents, and pupils in developing the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan.

(e) (1) The charter school shall present a report on the annual update to the local control and accountability plan and the local control funding formula budget overview for parents on or before February 28 of each year as part of a nonconsent item at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body of the charter school.

(2) The report shall include both of the
 following:

(A) All available midyear outcome data related to metrics identified in the current year’s local control and accountability plan.

(B) All available midyear expenditure and implementation data on all actions identified in the current year’s local control and accountability plan.

(f) The governing body of a charter school shall hold at least one public hearing to solicit the recommendations and comments of members of the public regarding the specific actions and expenditures proposed to be included in the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan. The agenda for the public hearing shall be posted at least 72 hours before the public hearing, and the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan
 shall be made available for public inspection at each site operated by the charter school.

(g) The governing body of a charter school may adopt revisions to a local control and accountability plan during the period the local control and accountability plan is in effect. The governing body of a charter school may only adopt a revision to a local control and accountability plan if it follows the process to adopt a local control and accountability plan pursuant to this section and the revisions are adopted in a public meeting.

(h) Pursuant to Section 47604.33, the charter school shall submit the adopted or revised local control and accountability plan pursuant to this section to its chartering authority and the county superintendent of schools, or only to the county superintendent of schools if the county board of education is the chartering authority.

(i) The charter school shall prominently post on the home page of the internet website of the charter school any local control and accountability plan adopted by the governing body of the charter school, and any updates, revisions, or addenda, including those to comply with federal law, to a local control and accountability plan approved by the governing body of the charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 48.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

47607.

(a) (1) A charter may be granted pursuant to Sections 47605, 47605.5, 47605.6, and 47606 for a period not to exceed five years.

(2) A chartering authority may grant one or more subsequent renewals pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) and Section 47607.2. Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c) and Section 47607.2, a chartering authority may deny renewal pursuant to subdivision (e).

(3) A charter school that, concurrently with its renewal, proposes to expand operations to one or more additional sites or grade levels shall request a material revision to its charter. A material revision of the provisions of a charter petition may be made only with the approval of the chartering
 authority. A material revision of a charter is governed by the standards and criteria described in Section 47605.

(4) The findings of paragraphs (7) and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 shall not be used to deny a renewal of an existing charter school, but may be used to deny a proposed expansion constituting a material revision. For a material revision, analysis under paragraphs (7) and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 shall be limited to consideration only of the impact of the proposed material revision.

(5) The chartering authority may inspect or observe any part of the charter school at any time.

(b) Renewals and material revisions of charters are governed by the standards and criteria described in Section 47605, and shall include, but not be limited to, a reasonably comprehensive description of any
 new requirement of charter schools enacted into law after the charter was originally granted or last renewed. Notwithstanding any other law, and beginning on July 1, 2026, standards and criteria include timelines, deadlines, and other procedures referenced in subdivision (b) of Section 47605 or subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable.

(c) (1) As an additional criterion for determining whether to grant a charter renewal, the chartering authority shall consider the performance of the charter school on the state and local indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5.

(2) (A) The chartering authority shall not deny renewal for a charter school pursuant to this subdivision if either of the
 following apply for two consecutive years immediately preceding the renewal decision:

(i) The charter school has received the two highest performance levels schoolwide on all the state indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5 for which it receives performance levels.

(ii) For all measurements of academic performance, the charter school has received performance levels schoolwide that are the same or higher than the state average and, for a majority of subgroups performing statewide below the state average in each respective year, received performance levels that are higher than the state average.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), if the two consecutive years immediately preceding the renewal decision include the 2019–20 or 2020–21 school year, the chartering authority shall
 not deny renewal for a charter school if either of the following apply for two of the most recent years for which state data is available preceding the renewal decision:

(i) The charter school has received the two highest performance levels schoolwide on all the state indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5 for which it receives performance levels.

(ii) For all measurements of academic performance, the charter school has received performance levels schoolwide that are the same or higher than the state average and, for a majority of subgroups performing statewide below the state average in each respective year, received performance levels that are higher than the state average.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), a charter school eligible for technical assistance
 pursuant to Section 47607.3 shall not qualify for renewal under this paragraph.

(D) A charter school that meets the criteria established by this paragraph and subdivision (a) of Section 47607.2 shall not qualify for treatment under this paragraph.

(E) The chartering authority that granted the charter may renew a charter pursuant to this paragraph for a period of between five and seven years.

(F) A charter that satisfies the criteria in subparagraph (A) or (B) shall only be required to update the petition to include a reasonably comprehensive description of any new requirement of charter schools enacted into law after the charter was originally granted or last renewed and as necessary to reflect the current program offered by the charter.

(3) For
 purposes of this section and Section 47607.2, “measurements of academic performance” means indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5 that are based on statewide assessments in the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress system, or any successor system, the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California, or any successor system, and the college and career readiness indicator.

(4) For purposes of this section and Section 47607.2, “subgroup” means numerically significant pupil subgroups as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 52052.

(5) To qualify for renewal under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2), subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 47607.2, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 47607.2, the charter school shall have schoolwide
 performance levels on at least two measurements of academic performance per year in each of the two consecutive years immediately preceding the renewal decision. To qualify for renewal under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2), subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 47607.2, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 47607.2, the charter school shall have performance levels on at least two measurements of academic performance for at least two subgroups. A charter school without sufficient performance levels to meet these criteria shall be considered under subdivision (b) of Section 47607.2.

(6) For purposes of this section and Section 47607.2, if the dashboard indicators are not yet available for the most recently completed academic year before renewal, the chartering authority shall consider verifiable data provided by the charter school related to the dashboard indicators, such as data
 from the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress, or any successor system, for the most recent academic year.

(7) Paragraph (2) and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 47607.2 shall not apply to a charter school that is eligible for alternate methods for calculating the state and local indicators pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 52064.5. In determining whether to grant a charter renewal for such a charter school, the chartering authority shall consider, in addition to the charter school’s performance on the state and local indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52064.5, the charter school’s performance on alternative metrics applicable to the charter school based on the pupil population served. The chartering authority shall meet with the charter school during the first year of the charter school’s term to mutually agree to discuss alternative metrics to be considered
 pursuant to this paragraph and shall notify the charter school of the alternative metrics to be used within 30 days of this meeting. The chartering authority may deny a charter renewal pursuant to this paragraph only upon making written findings, setting forth specific facts to support the findings, that the closure of the charter school is in the best interest of pupils.

(d) (1) At the conclusion of the year immediately preceding the final year of the charter school’s term, the
 chartering authority may request, and the department shall provide, the following aggregate data reflecting pupil enrollment patterns at the charter school:

(A) The cumulative enrollment for each school year of the charter school’s term. For purposes of this chapter, cumulative enrollment is defined as the total number of pupils, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and pupil subgroups, who enrolled in school at any time during the school year.

(B) For each school year of the charter school’s term, the percentage of pupils enrolled at any point between the beginning of the school year and census day who were not enrolled at the conclusion of that year, and the average results on the statewide assessments in the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress system, or any successor system, for any such pupils who were enrolled in
 the charter school the prior school year.

(C) For each school year of the charter school’s term, the percentage of pupils enrolled the prior school year who were not enrolled as of census day for the school year, except for pupils who completed the grade that is the highest grade served by the charter school, and the average results on the statewide assessments in the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress system, or any successor system, for any such pupils.

(2) When determining whether to grant a charter renewal, the chartering authority shall review data provided pursuant to paragraph (1), any data that may be provided to chartering authorities by the department, and any substantiated complaints that the charter school has not complied with subparagraph (J) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or with subparagraph (J) of paragraph (5) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6.

(3) As part of its determination of whether to grant a charter renewal based on the criterion established pursuant to subdivision (c) and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 47607.2, the chartering authority may make a finding that the charter school is not serving all pupils who wish to attend and, upon making such a finding, specifically identify the evidence supporting the finding.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 47607.2, the chartering authority may deny renewal of a charter school upon a finding that the school is demonstrably unlikely to successfully implement the program set forth in the petition due to substantial fiscal or governance factors, or is not serving all pupils who wish to attend, as documented pursuant to subdivision (d). The chartering authority may deny renewal of a charter school
 under this subdivision only after it has provided at least 30 days’ notice to the charter school of the alleged violation and provided the charter school with a reasonable opportunity to cure the violation, including a corrective action plan proposed by the charter school. The chartering authority may deny renewal only by making either of the following findings:

(1) The corrective action proposed by the charter school has been unsuccessful.

(2) The violations are sufficiently severe and pervasive as to render a corrective action plan unviable.

(f) A charter may be revoked by the chartering authority if the chartering authority finds, through a showing of substantial evidence, that the charter school did any of the following:

(1) Committed a material
 violation of any of the conditions, standards, or procedures set forth in the charter.

(2) Failed to meet or pursue any of the pupil outcomes identified in the charter.

(3) Failed to meet generally accepted accounting principles, or engaged in fiscal mismanagement.

(4) Violated any law.

(g) Before revocation, the chartering authority shall notify the charter school of any violation of this section and give the school a reasonable opportunity to remedy the violation, unless the chartering authority determines, in writing, that the violation constitutes a severe and imminent threat to the health or safety of the pupils.

(h) Before revoking a charter for failure to remedy a violation pursuant
 to subdivision (f), and after expiration of the school’s reasonable opportunity to remedy without successfully remedying the violation, the chartering authority shall provide a written notice of intent to revoke and notice of facts in support of revocation to the charter school. No later than 30 days after providing the notice of intent to revoke a charter, the chartering authority shall hold a public hearing, in the normal course of business, on the issue of whether evidence exists to revoke the charter. No later than 30 days after the public hearing, the chartering authority shall issue a final decision to revoke or decline to revoke the charter, unless the chartering authority and the charter school agree to extend the issuance of the decision by an additional 30 days. The chartering authority shall not revoke a charter, unless it makes written factual findings supported by substantial evidence, specific to the charter school, that support its findings.

(i) (1) If a school district is the chartering authority and it revokes a charter pursuant to this section, the charter school may appeal the revocation to the county board of education within 30 days following the final decision of the chartering authority.

(2) The county board of education may reverse the revocation decision if the county board of education determines that the findings made by the chartering authority under subdivision (h) are not supported by substantial evidence. The school district may appeal the reversal to the state board.

(3) If the county board of education does not issue a decision on the appeal within 90 days of receipt, or the county board of education upholds the revocation, the charter school may appeal the revocation to the state board.

(4) The state
 board may reverse the revocation decision if the state board determines that the findings made by the chartering authority under subdivision (h) are not supported by substantial evidence. The state board may uphold the revocation decision of the school district if the state board determines that the findings made by the chartering authority under subdivision (h) are supported by substantial evidence.

(j) (1) If a county board of education is the chartering authority and the county board of education revokes a charter pursuant to this section, the charter school may appeal the revocation to the state board within 30 days following the decision of the chartering authority.

(2) The state board may reverse the revocation decision if the state board determines that the findings made by the chartering authority under subdivision (h) are not supported by substantial
 evidence.

(k) If the revocation decision of the chartering authority is reversed on appeal, the agency that granted the charter shall continue to be regarded as the chartering authority.

(l) During the pendency of an appeal filed under this section, a charter school whose revocation proceedings are based on paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (f) shall continue to qualify as a charter school for funding and for all other purposes of this part, and may continue to hold all existing grants, resources, and facilities, in order to ensure that the education of pupils enrolled in the school is not disrupted.

(m) Immediately following the decision of a county board of education to reverse a decision of a school district to revoke a charter, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The charter school shall qualify as a charter school for funding and for all other purposes of this part.

(2) The charter school may continue to hold all existing grants, resources, and facilities.

(3) Any funding, grants, resources, and facilities that had been withheld from the charter school, or that the charter school had otherwise been deprived of use, as a result of the revocation of the charter, shall be immediately reinstated or returned.

(n) A final decision of a revocation or appeal of a revocation pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be reported to the chartering authority, the county board of education, and the department.

(o) The requirements of this section shall not be waived by
 the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 95.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

47607.2.

(a) (1) The chartering authority shall not renew a charter if either of the following apply for two consecutive years immediately preceding the renewal decision:

(A) The charter school has received the two lowest performance levels schoolwide on all the state indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5 for which it receives performance levels.
